California statutes. Financial Code
(b) No officer, director, committee member, or employee of any credit union shall approve a person for admission to membership or admit an applicant for membership in the credit union or extend any benefit or service of the credit union to any person, unless that person is admitted to membership in the credit union pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) Nothing in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be construed to limit the powers of a credit union to engage in joint service programs or business relationships for the benefit of their members where some incidental benefit may flow to third parties to the transaction or the authority for a credit union to engage in joint loan programs pursuant to Section 14959.

(d) Nothing in this section prohibits
 a credit union from admitting to membership a corporation in which the credit union holds shares pursuant to Section 14650 or a corporation formed to provide services to credit unions or to credit union members in which the credit union holds shares or a limited liability company formed to provide services to credit unions or to credit union members in which the credit union holds membership or economic interests pursuant to Section 14651.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 411, Sec. 3.   Effective September 12, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

14800.1.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 14800 or Section 14750, a credit union may do all of the following:

(1) Provide the services specified in paragraph (2) to a natural person within the field of membership, regardless of whether the person is admitted to membership, and charge a fee for the provision of those services, which fee shall not exceed the cost to provide those services.

(2) (A) Sell checks and other similar money transfer instruments, including international and domestic electronic fund transfers.

(B) Cash checks and other similar
 money transfer instruments and receive international and domestic electronic fund transfers.

(b) For purposes of this section, “checks” shall have the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 3104 of the Commercial Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 246, Sec. 1.   (AB 2006)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14801.

Every credit union may expel members as provided in Section 14456 of this division and Section 7341 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 209, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

14802.

Each member shall keep the credit union informed of his current address. In the event a member fails to do this, a charge may be made to the member’s share account for the actual cost of necessary locator service incurred in determining such an address; provided, however, that such charge shall not exceed five dollars ($5). Such charge shall be made only for amounts paid to a person or concern normally engaged in providing such service and shall be made against the account or accounts of any one member no more than once in any 12-month period.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

14803.

(a) No credit union shall pay any commission or compensation to any person for securing a new member or for getting an existing member to make an additional deposit.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a credit union may, pursuant to an incentive policy approved by the board of directors, offer and pay a reasonable incentive or inducement to (1) a nonmember for becoming a member of the credit union, (2) an existing member for depositing additional funds, and (3) an employee
 or member who assists in getting a nonmember to become a new member of the credit union or who assists in getting an existing member to make an additional deposit.

(c) Nothing in subdivision (a) limits a credit union from using growth in the number of members in the credit union as part of its compensation program for its employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 539, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14804.

(a) (1) The members of a credit union shall hold an annual meeting for the election of all of the following:

(A) Directors.

(B) A supervisory committee, unless the board of directors has appointed an audit committee pursuant to Section 14556.

(C) A credit committee, if provided for in its bylaws.

(2) An annual meeting required by this subdivision shall be held at a time and place, and upon notice, as the bylaws provide.

(b) Unless prohibited by the articles or bylaws of the credit union, a
 regular or special meeting of the members, including an annual meeting, may be conducted, in whole or in part, by means of remote communication as set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 7510 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 305, Sec. 7.   (AB 2062)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14805.

(a) Special meetings of members may be held upon order of the board of directors. Special meetings of members shall be held upon the written request of 10 members or 3 percent of the membership, whichever is greater. Notice of special meetings shall be given to all members specifying the date, time, place, and purpose of the meeting.

(b) Unless prohibited by the articles or bylaws of the credit union, a regular or special meeting of members, including an annual meeting, may be conducted, in whole or in part, by means of remote communication as set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 7510 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 305, Sec. 8.   (AB 2062)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14806.

In credit unions formed on or after September 15, 1945, no member shall have more than one vote irrespective of the number of shares held by the member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 539, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14807.

(a) A member may withdraw from membership in the credit union at any time. A withdrawing member may be required to give 60 days’ notice of intention to withdraw shares and 30 days’ notice of intention to withdraw certificates for funds, except when a different period of notice is required by the commissioner for the withdrawal of shares or share certificates that may be established by the board of directors.

(b) A member who fails to take steps necessary to be removed from inactive status pursuant to Section 14811 may be deemed to have voluntarily withdrawn from credit union membership.

(c) A member whose funds have been
 remitted to the Controller’s office for purposes of escheat consistent with Section 1513 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall be deemed to have voluntarily withdrawn from membership.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 762, Sec. 7.   (SB 269)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14808.

All amounts paid on shares or on certificates for funds of an expelled or withdrawn member, with any dividends or interest credited thereto to the date of withdrawal or expulsion, shall be paid to such members as funds become available, and after deducting all amounts due from the member to the credit union. Withdrawing or expelled members have no further rights in the credit union, but are not by expulsion or withdrawal released from any liability to the credit union or its creditors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 89, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

14809.

Members who leave the field of membership may be permitted to retain their membership in the credit union unless otherwise provided in the credit union’s bylaws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

14811.

(a) A member who has no outstanding obligations with the credit union and whose share account is below the amount established by the bylaws may be transferred to inactive member status.

(b) An inactive member has no voting rights, has no right to notice of meetings of members, shall not be considered a member for purposes of determination of a quorum or a required vote and need not be sent the annual report or financial statements except upon request.

(c) When one or more of the conditions in subdivision (a) cease to be applicable, an inactive member may be transferred back to regular
 member status.

(d) (1) A member who remains on inactive status for a period of at least 90 days after written notice from the credit union may be deemed to have voluntarily withdrawn from credit union membership.

(2) The written notice referred to in paragraph (1) shall notify the member of, at a minimum, all of the following:

(A) That the member has been transferred to inactive status.

(B) The steps that the member may take to be transferred back to regular member status.

(C) That failure to take the steps necessary to be transferred back to regular member status within 90 days,
 or another period of time in excess of 90 days that the credit union specifies in its bylaws, will be deemed a voluntary withdrawal from credit union membership.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 762, Sec. 8.   (SB 269)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14812.

Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, a quorum for a meeting of members shall be 10 percent of the members or 50 members, whichever is less.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 321, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

14820.

(a) Any member of a credit union may authorize another person or persons to act by proxy with respect to such membership, subject to subdivision (e). Any proxy purported to be executed in accordance with Section 14821 shall be presumptively valid.

(b) No proxy shall be valid after the expiration of 11 months from the date thereof unless otherwise provided in the proxy, except that the maximum term of any proxy shall be three years from the date of execution. Every proxy continues in full force and effect until revoked by the person executing it prior to the vote
 pursuant thereto, except as otherwise provided in this section. Such revocation may be effected by a writing delivered to the corporation stating that the proxy is revoked or by a subsequent proxy executed by the person executing the prior proxy and presented to the meeting, or as to any meeting by attendance at such meeting and voting in person by the person executing the proxy. The dates contained on the forms of proxy presumptively determine the order of execution, regardless of the postmark dates on the envelopes in which they are mailed.

(c) A proxy is not revoked by the death or incapacity of the maker or the termination of a membership as a result thereof unless, before the vote is counted, written notice of such death or incapacity is received by the corporation.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivisions (b) and (c), whenever any credit union which is subject to the provisions of
 this division is insolvent or its capital is impaired, or, when the commissioner determines that a credit union is in danger of insolvency or an impairment of its capital and the board of the directors of the credit union presents a reorganization plan to the commissioner and such plan is approved, the board of directors may, subject to the provisions of this division, solicit irrevocable proxies for a proxyholder who qualifies pursuant to this section. Unless otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, the proxy of a member which states that it is irrevocable is irrevocable for the period specified therein when it is held by any of the following or a nominee of any of the following:

(1) A person who has purchased or who has agreed to purchase the membership. 

(2) A creditor or creditors of the credit union who extended or continued credit or contracted to perform services to
 the corporation in consideration of the proxy if the proxy states that it was given in consideration of the extension or continuation of credit or services and the name of the person extending or continuing the credit or performing the service.

(3) A person who has contracted to perform services as an employee of the credit union, if the proxy is required by the contract of employment and if the proxy states that it was given in consideration of such contract of employment, the name of the employee, and the period of employment for which the employee has contracted.

Notwithstanding the period of irrevocability specified, the proxy becomes revocable when the agreement to purchase is terminated, the debt of the credit union or the member is paid, or the period of employment provided for in the contract of employment or the contract to perform services has terminated. In addition to paragraphs (1) through
 (3), a proxy of a member may be made irrevocable notwithstanding subdivision (c) if it is given to secure the performance of a duty or to protect a title, either legal or equitable, until the happening of events which by its terms, discharge the obligations secured by it.

(e) Subdivision (a) notwithstanding:

(1) No amendment of the articles or bylaws repealing, restricting, creating or expanding proxy rights may be adopted without approval by the members.

(2) No amendment of the articles or bylaws restricting or limiting the use of proxies may affect the validity of a previously issued irrevocable proxy during the term of its irrevocability, so long as it complied with applicable provisions, if any, of the articles or bylaws at the time of issuance, and is otherwise valid under this section.

(f) Anything to the contrary notwithstanding, any revocable proxy covering matters requiring a vote of the members pursuant to Section 7222, Section 7224, Section 7233, Section 7812, paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 7911, Section 8012, subdivision (a) of Section 8015, Section 8610, or subdivision (a) of Section 8719 of the Nonprofit Mutual Benefit Corporation Law, Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, or subdivision (e) is not valid as to such matters unless it sets forth the general nature of the matter to be voted on.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 951, Sec. 10.5.)
-------------------------------------------

14821.

(a) Except for solicited proxies which on their face provide for a period of validity of three years from the date of execution of the proxy, any form of proxy or written ballot distributed to 10 or more members of a credit union shall afford an opportunity on the proxy or form of written ballot to specify at the time the written ballot or proxy is distributed, a choice between approval and disapproval of each matter or group of related matters intended to be acted upon at the meeting for which the proxy is solicited or by such written ballot, and shall provide, subject to reasonable specified conditions, that where the person
 solicited specifies a choice with respect to any such matter the vote shall be cast in accordance therewith.

(b) In any election of directors, any form of proxy or written ballot in which the directors to be voted upon are named therein as candidates and which is marked by a member “withhold” or otherwise marked in a manner indicating that the authority to vote for the election of directors is withheld, shall not be voted either for or against the election of a director.

(c) In the case of any solicited proxy which on its face provides for a period of validity of three years from the date of execution of the proxy, the credit union shall provide to the person executing the proxy a written notice at the time of solicitation and in each succeeding year of validity thereof, which shall advise the member of the nature of each matter or group of related matters on which the proxy may
 be voted. Notice pursuant to this subdivision may be sent with notice to the members of the date, time, and place of the annual meeting.

(d) Failure to comply with this section shall not invalidate any corporate action taken, but may be the basis for challenging any proxy at a meeting or written ballot and the superior court may compel compliance therewith at the suit of any member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1045, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14822.

Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, no member shall vote by proxy on any matter submitted by mail to all members of a credit union in a written ballot pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 7510) of Part 3 of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, and the powers of any previously issued or outstanding valid, revocable proxy are suspended when any matter is submitted by mail to all members in a written ballot pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 7510) of Part 3 of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 209, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Share Accounts and Certificates for Funds [14850. - 14905.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [14850. - 14870.]

14850.

The Corporate Securities Law relating to the necessity of qualification of the sale of securities does not apply to the sale and issue of membership shares, certificates for funds, and other securities, by credit unions organized under this division or lawfully doing business in this state. No credit union lawfully doing business in this state shall be required to file a certificate for determination of preference with the office of the Secretary of State in connection with any share offering so long as it complies with all applicable provisions of this division and the rules of the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 321, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

14851.

(a) A credit union may issue shares as follows:

(1) To a member qualified pursuant to the credit union’s bylaws.

(2) To an officer, employee, or agent of nonmember units of federal, Indian tribal, state, or local governments, and political subdivisions thereof, when acting in that officer’s, employee’s, or agent’s official capacity.

(3) To a member or nonmember state or federal credit union.

(4) (A) In coownership to a member and a person designated by
 the member.

(B) As used in this paragraph, coownership includes, but is not limited to, joint tenancy, tenancy in common, or community property forms of ownership.

(b) Membership privileges, including voting and obtaining a loan, may not be made available to a nonmember as a result of ownership of shares solely as a coowner of shares with a member. A certificate or other evidence of shares that is issued shall contain the words “No transfer of voting rights or other membership privilege is permitted by virtue of a transfer of shares.” Shares may be transferred to a public agency lawfully entitled to receive the shares when designated by a member as an assignee of an account pledged as a surety deposit to the public agency by the member.

(c) A credit union that has a low-income designation pursuant to Section 701.34 of the regulations of the National Credit Union Administration (12 C.F.R. Sec. 701.34) may issue shares to nonmembers. Except with the written approval of the commissioner, the total number of shares issued by the credit union to nonmembers pursuant to this subdivision shall not exceed 20 percent of the unimpaired capital and surplus of the credit union.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 762, Sec. 9.   (SB 269)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14852.

Every credit union may charge a reasonable fee for the transfer of its shares.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

14853.

A credit union may issue shares or certificates for funds to a minor of any age or maintain any other account authorized for credit union members for a minor, and receive payments thereon by or for the minor. The minor is entitled to withdraw, transfer, or pledge any shares or certificates or other moneys owned by him or her and to receive from the credit union all dividends, interest, or other money due thereon in the same manner and subject to the same conditions as an adult. The receipt or acquittance of a minor constitutes a valid release and discharge of the credit union for the payment of dividends, interest, or other money due to the
 minor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 6, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

14854.

Subject to Section 14860, a credit union share account that is a multiple-party account, as defined in Section 5132 of the Probate Code, is governed by Part 2 (commencing with Section 5100) of Division 5 of the Probate Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79, Sec. 9.   Operative July 1, 1991, pursuant to Stats. 1990, Ch. 710, Sec. 46.)
-------------------------------------------

14855.

Every credit union may receive money and accumulate funds to be loaned and execute certificates for funds for the money received. The certificates for funds shall specify the date, amount, rate of interest, and when the principal and interest are payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

14856.

Every credit union may impress a lien upon the shares and dividends of any member to the extent of any obligations entered into with that member and for any dues or charges payable by that member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 789, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

14857.

Every credit union may cancel the shares of any member who withdraws or is expelled, and apply the value of the shares to the liquidation of the member’s indebtedness to the credit union.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

14858.

Every credit union shall apply for and obtain insurance as provided for by Title II of the Federal Credit Union Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1781 and following), or other insurance or guaranty of shares that is not unsatisfactory to the commissioner. In seeking and retaining this insurance or guaranty, a credit union may do all things and assume and discharge all obligations required of it when not in conflict with the laws of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 539, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14860.

Except as provided in this section and Part 2 (commencing with Section 5100) of Division 5 of the Probate Code, no credit union shall exercise trust powers except upon qualifying as a trust company pursuant to Division 1 (commencing with Section 99).

(a) Notwithstanding any other law relating to trusts and trust authority, subject to the regulations of the commissioner, a credit union may act as a trustee or custodian, and may receive reasonable compensation for so acting, under any written trust instrument or custodial agreement created or organized in the United States which is a part of a pension, education, or medical plan for its members or groups or organizations of its members, which qualifies or
 has qualified for specific tax treatment under Section 220, 223, 401, 408, 408A, 457, or 530 of the Internal Revenue Code, Title 26 of the United States Code, or any deferred compensation plan for the benefit of the credit union’s employees, provided the funds received pursuant to these plans are invested as provided in Section 16040 of the Probate Code. All funds held by a credit union as trustee or in a custodial capacity shall be maintained in accordance with applicable laws and rules and regulations as may be promulgated by the Secretary of Labor, the Secretary of the Treasury, or any other authority exercising jurisdiction over the trust or custodial accounts. The credit union shall maintain individual records for each participant or beneficiary that show in detail all transactions relating to the funds of each participant or beneficiary.

The trust instrument or agreement shall provide for the appointment of a successor trustee or custodian by a person,
 committee, corporation, or organization other than the credit union or any person acting in his or her capacity as a director, employee, or agent of the credit union, upon notice from the credit union or the commissioner that the credit union is unwilling or unable to continue to act as trustee or custodian.

(b) Shares may be issued in a revocable or irrevocable trust subject to the following:

(1) When shares are issued in a revocable trust, the settlor shall be a member of the credit union issuing the shares in his or her own right. If the trust has joint settlors, who are spouses, then only one settlor need be a member of the credit union.

(2) When shares are issued in an irrevocable trust, the settlor or the beneficiary shall be a member of this credit union in his or her own right. For purposes of this section,
 shares issued pursuant to a pension plan authorized by this section shall be treated as an irrevocable trust unless otherwise indicated in rules and regulations issued by the commissioner.

(3) This subdivision does not apply to trust accounts established prior to the effective date of this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 37.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14861.

No credit union shall issue shares to anyone not qualified for membership under its bylaws, except shares issued in coownership as provided in Section 14851.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 52, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

14863.

(a) A credit union shall not impose any charge on a member or depositor holding a periodic certificate for funds for the failure of such member or depositor to invest, or for the late investment of, any agreed periodic installment investment in such a periodic certificate for funds. A credit union shall pay interest on periodic certificates for funds at the same rate of interest per annum as is paid on certificates for funds as to which a member or depositor has not agreed to make periodic installment investments.

(b) As used in this section “periodic certificate for funds” means a
 certificate for funds under which a member or depositor undertakes to make periodic investments of a specified amount into one account, except, however, a periodic certificate for funds shall not mean an impound account established for the purpose of payment of taxes or other expenses and obligations in connection with a loan secured by real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

14865.

Shares issued by a credit union to a member shall be evidenced in monetary amounts rather than by numbers of shares. The shares owned by a member also may be referred to as a “share account”. There shall be no limit to the amount of shares which a credit union may issue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 321, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

14866.

The evidence of credit union shares issued shall be a certificate, a passbook, a statement or other evidence approved by regulation of the commissioner. The evidence of any credit union shares shall not constitute an “investment security” under Division 8 (commencing with Section 8101) of the Commercial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 89, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

14867.

(a) Shares, including special shares, and certificates for funds may be withdrawn for payment to the owner or for any third party, in the manner and in accordance with written procedures which shall be established by the board of directors.

(b) The board of directors may waive any requirement of notice of intent to withdraw or provide that there is no requirement of notice of intent to withdraw or to transfer funds, except when requirement of the notice is imposed by applicable law.

(c) Unless otherwise
 provided by written agreement of the parties, the rights, responsibilities, and liabilities of a person regarding an item withdrawn from a credit union, or transferred to a credit union or otherwise handled by a credit union are defined in and determined by the provisions of Division 3 (commencing with Section 3101) and Division 4 (commencing with Section 4101) of the Commercial Code, as if the credit union were a bank.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 452, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

14868.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Beneficiary” has the meaning given that term in Section 5126 of the Probate Code.

(2) “Totten trust account” has the meaning given that term in Section 80 of the Probate Code.

(b) In the case of a Totten trust account, the deposit agreement shall indicate the current address of each beneficiary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 397, Sec. 18.   Operative July 1, 1990, by Sec. 42 of Ch. 397.)
-------------------------------------------

14870.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Nonqualifying account” means a deposit account, other than a demand deposit account, that is not a qualifying account.

(2) “Qualifying account” means a deposit account, other than a demand deposit account, through which a credit union’s depositors may obtain chances to win prizes in a savings promotion.

(3) “Savings promotion” means a contest or promotion to encourage savings deposits that is sponsored by one or more credit unions, or by a credit union trade association or its subsidiary in conjunction with one or more credit unions, and in which credit union depositors are offered a chance to win designated prizes.

(b) A credit union may sponsor or participate in a savings promotion if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) Credit union depositors are not required to pay any fee or otherwise provide any consideration in order to enter the savings promotion.

(2) All material terms of, and fees charged by a
 credit union in connection with, a qualifying account are comparable to those of comparable nonqualifying accounts offered by the credit union.

(3) Each entry in the savings promotion has an equal chance of winning.

(4) Participants in the savings promotion are not required to be present at a prize drawing in order to win.

(c) For
 purposes of this section, a depositor’s deposit of at least a specified amount of money in a qualifying account, which is required in order to enter the savings promotion, is not consideration if the interest rate associated with the qualifying account is not reduced, as compared to comparable nonqualifying accounts offered by the credit union, to account for the possibility of winning a prize.

(d) A savings promotion offered by a credit union shall not be considered a lottery within the meaning of Section 319 or 319.3 of the Penal Code, or a raffle within the meaning of Section 320.5 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 847, Sec. 2.   (SB 1055)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Dividends [14900. - 14905.]

14900.

Dividends need not be paid on a share account having less than the minimum balance prescribed in the bylaws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 267, Sec. 7.   (AB 2862)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

14901.

The rates of dividends and terms of payment may be established in advance by action of the board of directors. However, nothing in this section shall be construed to permit any credit union to pay a dividend except as provided in Section 14902.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 539, Sec. 34.7.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14902.

The directors of any credit union may, for the dividend period, declare dividends from its undivided profits as provided by law, but no credit union shall credit or pay any dividends or pay loan interest refunds to its members until it has transferred to its regular reserve such part of its gross income as is required by Section 14700. However, nothing in this division shall be construed to permit the credit union to credit or pay a dividend from its undivided profits account when the credit or payment would result in a deficit in the undivided profits account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 263, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

14905.

Amounts paid or credited by a credit union to its members or depositors on or before the 30th day after the close of its income year shall be deemed for all purposes as paid or credited by the credit union upon the last day of the income year. This section is applicable only to credit unions as entities and does not apply to the members or depositors thereof.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 14907 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 303, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Loans [14950. - 15103.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [14950. - 14961.]

14950.

(a) Every credit union may enter into obligations with its members upon the approval of the credit committee or, in the alternative, the credit manager, subject to the terms and conditions established by the board of directors pursuant to Section 15100.

(b) (1) The board of directors of a credit union shall adopt a policy governing the acceptance by the credit union of notes receivable from nonmembers as consideration for the sale of assets owned by the credit union through bona fide transactions.

(2) No credit union may accept notes receivable from nonmembers as
 consideration for the sale of assets owned by the credit union except in accordance with a policy adopted by the board of directors pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) Transactions subject to this subdivision shall not be deemed to be loans to nonmembers for purposes of Section 14750.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a credit union may permit a nonmember to participate in an obligation or extension of credit to a member as a joint applicant, co-obligor, coborrower, surety, or guarantor. An obligation or extension of credit made pursuant to this subdivision shall not be deemed a violation of subdivision (b) of Section 14800. Except as otherwise permitted by statute or regulation, the credit union shall not extend any other benefit or service of the credit union to the nonmember solely as a
 result of participation as a joint applicant, co-obligor, coborrower, surety, or guarantor unless the nonmember is thereafter admitted to membership.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 353, Sec. 8.   (AB 2274)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14952.

(a) The board of directors of a credit union shall establish the maximum amount that the credit union may lend to a member under 18 years of age in any case other than a case (1) where the member is an emancipated minor or (2) where the loan is secured in the manner provided for in Section 14955.

(b) No credit union shall make a loan to a member under 18 years of age that will result in the member being obligated to the credit union in excess of the maximum amount
 established by the board of directors pursuant to subdivision (a) unless the member is an emancipated minor or the loan is secured in the manner provided for in Section 14955.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 539, Sec. 36.5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14953.

(a) Any extension of credit in excess of the unsecured loan limit set by the board of directors pursuant to Section 15100 shall be secured either (1) by real or personal property to the extent that the extension of credit exceeds such limit, or (2) in the manner provided in Section 14955.

(b) If the security offered is an endorsed note as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 14955, a signed and dated financial statement shall be taken from each person who endorses the note and the sufficiency of the financial responsibility of every such endorser shall be verified
 by a majority of the credit committee. Obligations secured by the signatures of a borrower and endorser or endorsers shall not exceed the amount that may be extended to the borrower without security pursuant to Section 15100, plus an equivalent amount for each endorser; plus the amount of shares or certificates for funds pledged to secure the obligation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 209, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

14954.

For the purposes of this chapter, a person who is not an applicant for an extension of credit or the creation of an obligation with the credit union but guarantees performance of the underlying obligation is a surety. A surety may act as security pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14955.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 951, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

14955.

“Security” includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(a) A note endorsed by any member of the credit union or by any other person. 

(b) Any obligation wherein the payment of interest and principal is guaranteed by any municipal government, state government, the government of the United States, or by any instrumentality of the United States.

(c) The amounts which a member has invested in the credit union, either in the form of shares or in funds received. If the amount invested
 by a member is equal to the loan made to that member, he shall not be required to give further security.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

14957.

Whenever the directors, the credit committee, or if applicable, the credit manager, deem any loan unsafe, they may require additional security to be given by the borrower, and if such security is not furnished as required, they may declare the loan due and take action to collect the same.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 89, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

14958.

A credit union may participate in guaranteed loan programs of the federal or state governments, subject to the limitations on loans set forth in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 52, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

14959.

(a) A credit union may do either or both of the following:

(1) Purchase, in whole or in part, from any source, loans made to its members.

(2) Sell, in whole or in part, to any source, loans made to its members.

(b) A credit union may purchase, in whole or in part, either or both of the following:

(1) A loan originated by another credit union, which is made to a member of the originating credit union even though the member is not also a member of the credit union purchasing the loan.

(2) A loan from any source, if the purchase will facilitate the purchasing credit union’s packaging of a pool of those loans to be sold or pledged on the secondary market.

(c) A loan purchase that is authorized by this section shall not be an obligation with a nonmember within the meaning of Section 14750.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 267, Sec. 8.   (AB 2862)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

14960.
